Utah statutes.
13-21-4.   Bond, letter of credit, or certificate of deposit -- Not required
of agent if obtained by organization.
(1)  If a credit services organization has obtained a bond, letter of credit,
or certificate of deposit as set forth in Subsection 13-21-3(1) a salesperson,
agent, or representative who sells the services of that organization is not
required to post his own separate bond, letter of credit, or certificate of
deposit.
(2)  As used in this section, a person is not a salesperson, agent, or
representative of a credit services organization unless:
(a)  the person does business under the same name as the credit services
organization; or
(b)  the credit services organization and the issuer of the bond or letter of
credit certify in writing that the bond or letter of credit covers the person.
